Illinois, session 104th, HB4949.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Family 5Justice Centers Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds and 7declares that:8        (1) Underreporting of domestic violence, sexual 9    violence, stalking, and human trafficking to service 10    providers, law enforcement, and protective agencies is 11    detrimental to the health, safety, and welfare of the 12    State of Illinois. Survivors have stressed the need for 13    collaborative implementation of resources and interagency 14    communication and assessment of policies and procedures to 15    allow for intentional process improvement in the delivery 16    of and response to survivors.17        (2) To support survivors and their children and 18    encourage the development of partnerships to close gaps 19    and implement best practices, entities must work 20    collaboratively and actively to build a trauma-informed, 21    survivor-centered community response to prevent domestic 22    violence, child abuse, sexual violence, stalking, and 23    human trafficking.  HB4949 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17662 BDA 34073 b1        (3) The enactment of the Family Justice Centers Act 2    promotes the health and safety of survivors of domestic 3    violence, sexual violence, stalking, and human trafficking 4    and provides alternative ways for survivors to seek 5    services in a trauma-informed, survivor-centered, 6    coordinated manner.7        (4) In recent years, Illinois has experienced an 8    upward trend in domestic violence incidents, including 9    increased contacts to the Illinois Domestic Violence 10    Hotline and higher rates of domestic-related homicides. 11    Contacts to the Illinois Domestic Violence Hotline rose 12    26% from 2023 to 2024 to a total of 59,704 contacts, which 13    is 140% higher than in 2019, according to Measuring 14    Safety: Gender Based Violence in Illinois 2024, Illinois 15    Domestic Violence Hotline Report, published in June 2025 16    by The Network: Advocating Against Domestic Violence. This 17    rising rate of reports, coupled with the reality that many 18    incidents go unreported, demonstrates the need for a State 19    response. 20        (5) Given the intimate and personal nature of sexual 21    violence, advocacy services are necessary to support 22    survivors of sexual assault by providing comprehensive 23    assistance that addresses immediate and long-term needs. 24    The State of Illinois should continue to support these 25    programs, which have faced declining funds in recent 26    years.  HB4949 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17662 BDA 34073 b1        (6) In 2025, the Illinois General Assembly passed the 2    Illinois Statewide Trauma-Informed Response to Human 3    Trafficking Act, recognizing the need for a comprehensive 4    response to human trafficking in the State. This Act 5    requires agencies to investigate and respond in a 6    survivor-centered, trauma-informed manner to increase the 7    detection of survivors and provide a survivor-centered, 8    trauma-informed response when survivors present for 9    services.10        (7) The Family Justice Center framework offers a 11    comprehensive and collaborative approach to addressing 12    domestic violence, sexual violence, stalking, and human 13    trafficking. Family Justice Centers bring together 14    professionals and services under one roof, providing a 15    safe and supportive environment for survivors and ensuring 16    a coordinated and effective response.17        (8) Children's Advocacy Centers were established in 18    Illinois by Public Act 86-276 and are governed by the 19    Children's Advocacy Center Act. In response to the need 20    for a formal, comprehensive, integrated, and 21    multidisciplinary approach to child maltreatment, 22    Children's Advocacy Centers provide subject-matter 23    expertise that complements Family Justice Centers. This 24    Act is intended to enhance collaboration and sharing of 25    expertise and is not meant to supersede the expertise of 26    Children's Advocacy Centers. Domestic violence, sexual   HB4949 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17662 BDA 34073 b1    violence, and child abuse are forms of community violence 2    that require coordinated responses. Family Justice Centers 3    and Children's Advocacy Centers should work 4    collaboratively.5        (9) Family Justice Centers minimize the need for 6    survivors to navigate multiple agencies, to travel to 7    multiple locations, and to repeat their stories. They 8    offer services shown to improve access to services, 9    increase hope and well-being, reduce recantation, reduce 10    homicides, and increase successful prosecution of 11    offenders.12        (10) Creating Family Justice Centers is essential to 13    provide multiagency, multidisciplinary support and 14    services to survivors of domestic violence, sexual 15    violence, stalking, and human trafficking; to ensure 16    survivors can access all needed services; to enhance 17    survivor safety; to increase offender accountability; and 18    to reduce the number of times survivors are questioned and 19    examined and the number of places survivors must go to 20    receive assistance. 21    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:22    "Domestic violence" means any act of abuse as defined in 23the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986.24    "Human trafficking" means an act as set forth in Section 2510-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012, including recruiting,   HB4949 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17662 BDA 34073 b1harboring, transporting, providing, or obtaining a person for 2labor or services through force, fraud, or coercion.3    "Sexual violence" means physical sexual acts attempted or 4perpetrated against a person's will or when a person is 5incapable of giving consent, including, without limitation, 6rape, sexual assault, sexual battery, sexual abuse, and sexual 7coercion.8    "Stalking" has the meaning given to that term in the 9Stalking No Contact Order Act. "Stalking" includes, without 10limitation, the following conduct:11        (1) following a person;12        (2) conducting surveillance of the person;13        (3) appearing at the person's home, work, or school 14    without a reasonable purpose under the circumstances;15        (4) making unwanted phone calls;16        (5) sending unwanted mail;17        (6) sending unwanted messages via social media;18        (7) sending unwanted text messages;19        (8) leaving objects for the person;20        (9) vandalizing the person's property;21        (10) injuring a pet; or22        (11) using any electronic tracking system or acquiring 23    tracking information to determine the person's location, 24    movements, or travel patterns. 25    Section 15. Family Justice Centers.   HB4949 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17662 BDA 34073 b1    (a) A city, county, State, community-based nonprofit 2organization, or a combination of these entities may establish 3a multiagency, multidisciplinary Family Justice Center to 4assist survivors of domestic violence, sexual violence, 5stalking, and human trafficking, to ensure that survivors are 6able to access needed services in one location, to enhance 7survivor safety, to increase offender accountability, and to 8improve access to services.9    (b) A Family Justice Center is a multiagency, 10multidisciplinary service center where public and private 11agencies assign staff members on a full-time or part-time 12basis to provide services to survivors of domestic violence, 13sexual violence, stalking, and human trafficking from one 14location, to reduce the number of times survivors must repeat 15their accounts, to reduce the number of places survivors must 16go for help, and to increase access to services and support for 17survivors and their children. A Family Justice Center shall, 18as appropriate, partner with other agencies to provide 19services.20    (c) Staff members at a Family Justice Center may include, 21but are not limited to:22        (1) domestic violence providers recognized by the 23    Department of Human Services;24        (2) rape crisis organizations as defined in Section 25    8-802.1 of the Code of Civil Procedure;26        (3) civil legal service providers, in accordance with   HB4949 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17662 BDA 34073 b1    memoranda of understanding developed by the Family Justice 2    Center;3        (4) legal advocacy providers, in accordance with 4    memoranda of understanding developed by the Family Justice 5    Center;6        (5) mental health care providers, in accordance with 7    memoranda of understanding developed by the Family Justice 8    Center;9        (6) housing providers, in accordance with memoranda of 10    understanding developed by the Family Justice Center;11        (7) substance-use counselors, in accordance with 12    memoranda of understanding developed by the Family Justice 13    Center;14        (8) Family Justice Center administrative personnel;15        (9) medical personnel;16        (10) local Children's Advocacy Centers;17        (11) law enforcement;18        (12) the State's Attorney's office and victim-witness 19    personnel;20        (13) supervised volunteers of partner agencies; and21        (14) other professional agencies serving survivors of 22    domestic violence, sexual violence, stalking, or human 23    trafficking, in accordance with memoranda of understanding 24    developed by the Family Justice Center.25    (d) If Department of Children and Family Services 26personnel are present on site at a Family Justice Center, they   HB4949 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17662 BDA 34073 b1shall only interact with a survivor receiving services from 2the Family Justice Center upon the survivor's request.3    (e) This Section does not abrogate existing laws regarding 4privacy or information sharing. Family Justice Center staff 5members shall comply with the laws governing their respective 6professions.7    (f) Survivors shall not be required to participate with 8law enforcement, the Department of Children and Family 9Services, or the criminal justice system to receive services 10at a Family Justice Center. A Family Justice Center shall 11establish memoranda of understanding with law enforcement, the 12Department of Children and Family Services, and State's 13Attorneys' offices to facilitate collaboration, improved 14processes, and systems change for the benefit of survivors and 15the health, safety, and well-being of the community.16    (g) Each Family Justice Center shall consult with 17statewide and local community-based domestic violence, sexual 18assault, stalking, and human trafficking agencies, in 19partnership with survivors and their advocates, in the 20operation of the Family Justice Center. Each Family Justice 21Center shall establish procedures for ongoing input, feedback, 22and evaluation by survivors and community-based survivor 23service providers and advocates.24    (h) Each Family Justice Center shall develop operating 25agreements, policies, and procedures, in collaboration with 26local community-based survivor service providers and local   HB4949 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17662 BDA 34073 b1survivors, to ensure coordinated services and to enhance the 2safety of survivors and professionals at the Family Justice 3Center, including participants in affiliated survivor-centered 4support or advocacy groups. Each Family Justice Center shall 5maintain a formal survivor feedback, complaint, and input 6process to address concerns about services or the conduct of 7any Family Justice Center professionals, agency partners, or 8volunteers.9    (i) Each Family Justice Center shall provide survivors 10with educational materials relating to rights available under 11Illinois law.12    (j) Each Family Justice Center shall maintain a survivor's 13informed, specific, and time-limited consent. The consent 14policy, and the sharing of any details gathered from the 15survivor, the survivor's family, or other sources shall follow 16all State and federal laws, including, but not limited to, the 17Violence Against Women Act of 1994, so as to protect the 18confidentiality of information gathered and any documents in a 19survivor's file, including, but not limited to, medical 20records, legal records, survivor counselor records, and any 21other information gathered during intake or throughout the 22period of engagement with the survivor. Each Family Justice 23Center shall develop privacy policies and procedures 24consistent with State and federal privacy and confidentiality 25laws and the Fair Information Practice Principles adopted by 26the U.S. Department of Homeland Security in Privacy Policy   HB4949 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17662 BDA 34073 b1Guidance Memorandum 2008-01.2    (k) A Family Justice Center shall obtain informed, 3written, time-limited consent from a survivor before sharing 4information obtained from the survivor with any staff member 5or agency partner, except that a Family Justice Center shall 6inform the survivor that information shared with staff members 7or partner agencies may be shared with the Department of 8Children and Family Services or a peace officer without the 9survivor's consent if there is a mandatory duty to report or if 10the survivor is a danger to self or others. A Family Justice 11Center shall obtain written acknowledgment that the survivor 12has been informed of this policy.13    (l) Consent by a survivor to share information within a 14Family Justice Center under this Section shall not be 15construed as a universal waiver of any evidentiary privilege 16that makes confidential communications or documents between 17the survivor and a service provider, including, without 18limitation, any lawyer, advocate, rape crisis counselor, or 19domestic violence counselor, and including protections under 20applicable State and federal law, such as the Address 21Confidentiality for Victims of Domestic Violence, Sexual 22Assault, Human Trafficking, or Stalking Act; and Sections 238-802, 8-802.1, and 8-802.2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. 24Any oral or written communication or document authorized by 25the survivor to be shared for the purposes of enhancing safety 26and providing more effective and efficient services shall not   HB4949 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17662 BDA 34073 b1be disclosed to any third party, unless authorized by the 2survivor or required by State or federal law or court order.3    (m) An individual staff member, volunteer, or agency that 4has survivor information governed by this Section shall not be 5required to disclose that information unless the survivor has 6consented to the disclosure or the disclosure is consistent 7with applicable State law regarding crime victims' rights.8    (n) A disclosure of information consented to by the 9survivor in a Family Justice Center, made for the purposes of 10clinical assessment, risk assessment, safety planning, or 11service delivery, shall not be deemed a waiver of any 12privilege or confidentiality provision contained in any other 13law of this State.14    (o) In addition to any other required training, each 15Family Justice Center shall maintain a training program with 16mandatory training of not less than 16 hours per year for all 17persons providing services at the Family Justice Center, 18including, but not limited to, training on evidentiary 19privileges, confidentiality provisions, information sharing, 20risk assessment, safety planning, survivor advocacy, and 21high-risk case response.